Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2731.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 75 O.S. 2021, Section 308.3, as
amended by Section 6, Chapter 38, O.S.L. 2023 (75 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 308.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 308.3. A. The Legislature shall have joint resolutions
prepared for consideration each session.
B. For the purpose of this section, a proposed permanent rule
may be disapproved, in whole or in part, in a joint resolution
considered by the Legislature.
C. If any rule received on or before the date established
pursuant to paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 308 of this title
is not subject to a joint resolution passed by both houses of the
Legislature and signed by the Governor or is found by the Governor
to have a technical legal defect preventing approval of

administrative rules intended to be approved by the Legislature, the
Governor may declare any rules received on or before April 1
February 1 and not subject to a joint resolution passed by both
houses of the Legislature to be approved or disapproved and finally
adopted by publishing a single declaration in "The Oklahoma
Register" on or before July 17. If the Governor finds that the
joint resolution has a technical legal defect, the Governor shall
make the finding in writing and submit the finding to the
Legislature.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2731 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 26th day of February,
2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2731 Page 3